cs: Typ klíče na běžecký trenažér: Klíč se sponou; Zásuvný klíč; Magnetický plochý; Magnetický kulatý; Plastová vložka; Zasouvací spona; Klíč dálkového zastavení; Bezpečnostní zástrčka; Univerzální / ve tvaru T; Jiné
en: Treadmill key type: Clip-on Key; Insert Slot; Magnetic Flat; Magnetic Round; Plastic Insert; Push-in Clip; Remote Stop Key; Safety Plug; Universal/T-shaped; Other
nl: Loopband veiligheidssleutel type: Clip-on-sleutel; Insteeksleuf; Plat magnetisch; Rond magnetisch; Plastic insteeksleutel; Insteekclip; Afstandsbediening-stopsleutel; Veiligheidsstekker; Universeel/T-vormig; Overig
el: Τύπος κλειδιού για διάδρομο: Κλειδί με κλιπ; Υποδοχή εισαγωγής; Επίπεδο μαγνητικό; Στρογγυλό μαγνητικό; Πλαστικό ένθετο; Κλιπ πίεσης; Κλειδί απομακρυσμένης διακοπής λειτουργίας; Βύσμα ασφαλείας; Γενικής χρήσης/Σχήματος T; Άλλο
da: Type af løbebåndsnøgle: Clip-on-nøgle; Indsætningsåbning; Magnetisk flad; Magnetisk rund; Plastikindsats; Push-in-klemme; Fjernstopnøgle; Sikkerhedsstik; Universal/T-formet; Andet
tr: Koşu bandı güvenlik anahtarı tipi: Klipsli anahtar; Geçmeli yuva; Manyetik düz; Manyetik yuvarlak; Plastik ek; İtmeli klips; Uzaktan durdurma anahtarı; Güvenlik fişi; Evrensel/T şeklinde; Diğer
zh-TW: 跑步機安全鎖類型: 夾式鑰匙; 插入式插槽; 磁性扁平款; 磁性圓形款; 塑膠插片; 推入式夾; 遠端停止鑰匙; 安全插頭; 通用/T 形; 其他
ru: Тип ключа беговой дорожки: Ключ с зажимом; Слот для вставки; Плоский магнитный; Круглый магнитный; Пластиковая вставка; Нажимной зажим; Ключ дистанционной остановки; Защитная заглушка; Универсальный/Т-образный; Другое
pl: Typ klucza bezpieczeństwa bieżni: Klucz z klipsem; Klucz wsuwany (do gniazda); Płaski klucz magnetyczny; Okrągły klucz magnetyczny; Plastikowa wkładka; Wciskany z klipsem; Zdalny klucz bezpieczeństwa (stop); Wtyczka bezpieczeństwa; Uniwersalny / w kształcie litery T; Inne
th: ประเภทปุ่มลู่วิ่ง: คีย์แบบหนีบ; ช่องเสียบ; แม่เหล็กแบบแบน; แม่เหล็กแบบกลม; สลักพลาสติก; คลิปแบบดันเข้า; คีย์หยุดรีโมท; ปลั๊กนิรภัย; อเนกประสงค์/รูปตัว T; อื่นๆ
hu: Futópad kulcsának típusa: Csíptetős kulcs; Bedugós; Lapos mágneses; Kerek mágneses; Műanyag betétes; Bepattintós klipsz; Távvezérlős leállítókulcs; Biztonsági dugó; Univerzális/T-alakú; Egyéb
ja: トレッドミルキータイプ: クリップオンキー; インサートスロット; マグネットフラット; マグネットラウンド; プラスチックインサート; プッシュインクリップ; リモートストップキー; セーフティプラグ; ユニバーサル / T字型; その他
lt-LT: Bėgimo takelio rakto tipas: Prisegamas raktas; Įkišamas į lizdą; Plokščias magnetinis; Apvalus magnetinis; Plastikinis įdėklas; Įspaudžiamas segtukas; Nuotolinis sustabdymo raktas; Saugos kištukas; Universalus / T formos; Kita
bg-BG: Тип ключ за безопасност на пътека за бягане: Ключ с щипка; Слот за поставяне; Магнитен плосък; Магнитен кръгъл; Пластмасова вложка; Щипка с натискане; Ключ за дистанционно спиране; Предпазна тапа; Универсален/Т-образен; Друго
ro-RO: Tipul cheii benzii de alergat: Cheie cu clemă; Fantă de inserție; Magnetică plată; Magnetică rotundă; Inserție din plastic; Clemă prin apăsare; Cheie de oprire la distanță; Fișă de siguranță; Universală/în formă de T; Altele
pt-BR: Esteira tipo de chave: Chave com clipe; Fenda de inserção; Magnética plana; Magnética redonda; Inserção de plástico; Clipe de encaixe por pressão; Chave de parada remota; Plugue de segurança; Universal/em formato de T; Outro
sk-SK: Typ kľúča na bežecký pás: Pripínací kľúč; Zásuvný otvor; Magnetický plochý; Magnetický okrúhly; Plastová vložka; Zatláčacia spona; Kľúč diaľkového zastavenia; Bezpečnostná zástrčka; Univerzálny/v tvare T; Iné
es: Tipo de llave de la cinta de correr: Llave con clip; Ranura de inserción; Magnética plana; Magnética redonda; Inserto de plástico; Clip a presión; Llave de parada remota; Tapón de seguridad; Universal/en forma de T; Otra
it: Tipo di chiave del tapis roulant: Chiave a clip; Ad inserimento; Magnetica piatta; Magnetica rotonda; Inserto in plastica; Clip a pressione; Chiave di arresto a distanza; Spina di sicurezza; Universale/a T; Altro
zh-CN: 跑步机钥匙类型: 夹式安全锁; 插槽; 扁平磁性; 圆形磁性; 塑料插入件; 按压夹; 远程停止键; 安全插头; 通用/T 形; 其他
sv: Löpbandsnyckeltyp: Klämnyckel; Insticksplats; Platt magnet; Rund magnet; Plastinsats; Insticksklämma; Fjärrstoppsnyckel; Säkerhetsplugg; Universal/T-formad; Övrigt
de: Typ des Laufbandschlüssels: Clip-on-Schlüssel; Einsteckschlitz; Magnetisch flach; Magnetisch rund; Kunststoffstecker; Push-in-Clip; Remote-Stopp-Schlüssel; Sicherheitsstecker; Universell/T-förmig; Sonstige
vi: Loại chìa khóa máy chạy bộ: Khóa kẹp; Khe cắm; Từ tính dẹt; Từ tính tròn; Chốt nhựa; Kẹp bấm; Khóa dừng từ xa; Phích cắm an toàn; Đa năng/chữ T; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de chave de segurança da passadeira: Chave de mola; Ranhura de inserção; Magnética plana; Magnética redonda; Encaixe de plástico; Mola de encaixe; Chave de paragem remota; Ficha de segurança; Universal/em forma de T; Outro
fi: Juoksumaton turva-avaimen tyyppi: Klipsiavain; Työntöaukko; Litteä magneetti; Pyöreä magneetti; Muovinen sisäke; Työnnettävä klipsi; Etäpysäytysavain; Turvapistoke; Yleissopiva/T-muotoinen; Muu
nb: Tredemølle-nøkkeltype: Nøkkel med klype; Spor for innsetting; Flat magnetisk; Rund magnetisk; Plastinnsats; Klype for innskyving; Fjernstopp-nøkkel; Sikkerhetsplugg; Universal / T-formet; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta ključa za tekalno stezo: Ključ s sponko; Zareza za vstavljanje; Ploščati magnetni; Okrogli magnetni; Plastični vložek; Potisna sponka; Ključ za zaustavitev na daljavo; Varnostni vtič; Univerzalni/T-oblika; Drugo
fr: Type de clé du tapis de course: Clé à pince; Clé à insérer; Magnétique plate; Magnétique ronde; Insert en plastique; Pince à insérer; Clé d'arrêt à distance; Fiche de sécurité; Universelle/en T; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta tipke za traku za trčanje: Ključ sa štipaljkom; Utor za umetanje; Magnetski plosnati; Magnetski okrugli; Plastični umetak; Utična kopča; Ključ za daljinsko zaustavljanje; Sigurnosni čep; Univerzalni / u obliku slova T; Ostalo
ko: 런닝머신 키 유형: 클립온 키; 삽입 슬롯; 마그네틱 플랫; 마그네틱 라운드; 플라스틱 인서트; 푸시인 클립; 원격 정지 키; 안전 플러그; 공용/T형; 기타